Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.800

Performance audit of authorized entities and school districts—Report. (Expires August 1, 2027.)

(1) The state auditor shall conduct a performance audit of the authorization, monitoring, and investigation of authorized entities and the school districts that contract with authorized entities under RCW 28A.155.060 to provide special education and related services to students with disabilities. As appropriate, the state auditor shall make recommendations for improving the system for overseeing authorized entities. The state auditor may conduct the performance audit at a sample of school districts and authorized nonpublic entities as needed.

(2) By November 30, 2026, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the state auditor shall report the performance audit's findings and recommendations to the governor and the education committees of the legislature.

(3) As used in this section, "authorized entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.300.690.

(4) This section expires August 1, 2027.

[ 2023 c 436 s 9.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 436: See note following RCW 28A.300.690.